Connecticut, session 2026, SB00502.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 46b-127 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) (1) The court shall automatically transfer from the docket for
juvenile matters to the regular criminal docket of the Superior Court the
case of any child charged with the commission of a capital felony under
the provisions of section 53a-54b in effect prior to April 25, 2012, a class
A felony, or a class B felony, except as provided in subdivision (3) of this
subsection, or a violation of section 53a-54d, provided such offense was
committed after such child attained the age of fifteen years and counsel
has been appointed for such child if such child is indigent. Such counsel
may appear with the child but shall not be permitted to make any
argument or file any motion in opposition to the transfer. The child shall
be arraigned in the regular criminal docket of the Superior Court at the
next court date following such transfer, provided any proceedings held
SB502 / File No. 592 1

SB502 File No. 592
prior to the finalization of such transfer shall be private and shall be
conducted in such parts of the courthouse or the building in which the
court is located that are separate and apart from the other parts of the
court which are then being used for proceedings pertaining to adults
charged with crimes.
(2) A state's attorney may, at any time after such arraignment, file a
motion to transfer the case of any child charged with the commission of
a class B felony or a violation of subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of
section 53a-70 to the docket for juvenile matters for proceedings in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
(3) No case of any child charged with the commission of a violation
of section 53a-55, 53a-59b, 53a-71 or 53a-94, subdivision (2) of subsection
(a) of section 53a-101, section 53a-112, 53a-122 or 53a-129b, subdivision
(1), (3) or (4) of subsection (a) of section 53a-134, section 53a-196c, 53a-
196d or 53a-252 or subsection (a) of section 53a-301 shall be transferred
from the docket for juvenile matters to the regular criminal docket of the
Superior Court, except as provided in this subdivision. Upon motion of
a prosecutorial official, the superior court for juvenile matters shall
conduct a hearing to determine whether the case of any child charged
with the commission of any such offense shall be transferred from the
docket for juvenile matters to the regular criminal docket of the Superior
Court. The court shall not order that the case be transferred under this
subdivision unless the court finds that (A) such offense was committed
after such child attained the age of fifteen years, (B) there is probable
cause to believe the child has committed the act for which the child is
charged, and (C) the best interests of the child and the public will not be
served by maintaining the case in the superior court for juvenile matters.
In making such findings, the court shall consider (i) any prior criminal
or juvenile offenses committed by the child, (ii) the seriousness of such
offenses, (iii) any evidence that the child has intellectual disability or
mental illness, and (iv) the availability of services in the docket for
juvenile matters that can serve the child's needs. Any motion under this
subdivision shall be made, and any hearing under this subdivision shall
be held, not later than thirty days after the child is arraigned in the
SB502 / File No. 592 2

SB502 File No. 592
superior court for juvenile matters.
(b) Upon motion of a prosecutorial official, the superior court for
juvenile matters shall conduct a hearing to determine whether the case
of any child charged with the commission of a class C, D or E felony or
an unclassified felony or any other offense not subject to the provisions
of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section that is a serious firearm
offense, as defined in section 53a-3, shall be transferred from the docket
for juvenile matters to the regular criminal docket of the Superior Court.
The court shall not order that the case be transferred under this
subdivision unless the court finds that (1) such offense was committed
after such child attained the age of fifteen years, (2) there is probable
cause to believe the child has committed the act for which the child is
charged, and (3) the best interests of the child and the public will not be
served by maintaining the case in the superior court for juvenile matters.
In making such findings, the court shall consider (A) any prior criminal
or juvenile offenses committed by the child, (B) the seriousness of such
offenses, (C) any evidence that the child has intellectual disability or
mental illness, and (D) the availability of services in the docket for
juvenile matters that can serve the child's needs. Any motion under this
subdivision shall be made [,] and [any hearing under this subdivision]
the hearing on such motion shall be held [,] not later than thirty days
after the child is arraigned in the superior court for juvenile matters,
except in the case of a child arraigned for a serious firearm offense, in
which case such motion shall be made and the hearing on such motion
shall be held not later than fifteen days after such child is arraigned.
(c) If a case is transferred to the regular criminal docket pursuant to
subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section or subsection (b) of this
section, or if a case is transferred to the regular criminal docket pursuant
to subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section and the charge in such
case is subsequently reduced to that of the commission of an offense for
which a case may be transferred pursuant to subdivision (2) or (3) of
subsection (a) of this section or subsection (b) of this section, the court
sitting for the regular criminal docket may return the case to the docket
for juvenile matters at any time prior to the court or jury rendering a
SB502 / File No. 592 3

SB502 File No. 592
verdict or the entry of a guilty plea for good cause shown for
proceedings in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
(d) Upon the effectuation of the transfer, such child shall stand trial
and be sentenced, if convicted, as if such child were eighteen years of
age, subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section and section
54-91g. Such child shall receive credit against any sentence imposed for
time served in a juvenile facility prior to the effectuation of the transfer.
A child who has been transferred may enter a guilty plea to a lesser
offense if the court finds that such plea is made knowingly and
voluntarily. Any child transferred to the regular criminal docket who
pleads guilty to a lesser offense shall not resume such child's status as a
juvenile regarding such offense. If the action is dismissed or nolled or if
such child is found not guilty of the charge for which such child was
transferred or of any lesser included offenses, the child shall resume
such child's status as a juvenile until such child attains the age of
eighteen years.
(e) Any child whose case is transferred to the regular criminal docket
100 of the Superior Court who is detained pursuant to such case shall be in
101 the custody of the Commissioner of Correction upon the finalization of
102 such transfer. A transfer shall be final (1) upon the arraignment on the
103 regular criminal docket until a motion filed by the state's attorney
104 pursuant to subsection (a) of this section is granted by the court, or (2)
105 upon the arraignment on the regular criminal docket of a transfer
106 ordered pursuant to subsection (b) of this section until the court sitting
107 for the regular criminal docket orders the case returned to the docket for
108 juvenile matters for good cause shown. Any child whose case is
109 returned to the docket for juvenile matters who is detained pursuant to
110 such case shall be in the custody of the Judicial Department.
111 (f) The transfer of a child to a Department of Correction facility shall
112 be limited as provided in subsection (e) of this section and said
113 subsection shall not be construed to permit the transfer of or otherwise
114 reduce or eliminate any other population of juveniles in detention or
115 confinement within the Judicial Department.
SB502 / File No. 592 4

SB502 File No. 592
116 (g) Upon the motion of any party or upon the court's own motion, the
117 case of any youth age sixteen or seventeen, except a case that has been
118 transferred to the regular criminal docket of the Superior Court
119 pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section, which is pending on the
120 youthful offender docket, regular criminal docket of the Superior Court
121 or any docket for the presentment of defendants in motor vehicle
122 matters, where the youth is charged with committing any offense or
123 violation for which a term of imprisonment may be imposed, other than
124 a violation of section 14-227a, 14-227g or 14-227m or subdivision (1) or
125 (2) of subsection (a) of section 14-227n, may, before trial or before the
126 entry of a guilty plea, be transferred to the docket for juvenile matters if
127 (1) the youth is alleged to have committed such offense or violation on
128 or after January 1, 2010, while sixteen years of age, or is alleged to have
129 committed such offense or violation on or after July 1, 2012, while
130 seventeen years of age, and (2) after a hearing considering the facts and
131 circumstances of the case and the prior history of the youth, the court
132 determines that the programs and services available pursuant to a
133 proceeding in the superior court for juvenile matters would more
134 appropriately address the needs of the youth and that the youth and the
135 community would be better served by treating the youth as a
136 delinquent. Upon ordering such transfer, the court shall vacate any
137 pleas entered in the matter and advise the youth of the youth's rights,
138 and the youth shall (A) enter pleas on the docket for juvenile matters in
139 the jurisdiction where the youth resides, and (B) be subject to
140 prosecution as a delinquent child. The decision of the court concerning
141 the transfer of a youth's case from the youthful offender docket, regular
142 criminal docket of the Superior Court or any docket for the presentment
143 of defendants in motor vehicle matters shall not be a final judgment for
144 purposes of appeal.
145 (h) Not later than January 15, 2027, and each January fifteenth
146 thereafter, the chief administrative judge for the Juvenile Division of the
147 Superior Court, or the chief administrative judge's designee, shall report
148 the number of motions by a prosecutor to transfer a case to the regular
149 criminal docket pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this
150 section or subsection (b) of this section, the offenses charged in the cases
SB502 / File No. 592 5

SB502 File No. 592
151 for which the transfers were sought and the disposition of such motions
152 during the previous calendar year in accordance with the provisions of
153 section 11-4a to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
154 having cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 46b-127
JUD Joint Favorable
SB502 / File No. 592 6

SB502 File No. 592
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes various changes to laws on the discretionary transfer
of certain cases from juvenile court to adult criminal court and requires
the Judicial Department to annually report on the number of motions
courts receive to transfer a juvenile case to the regular adult criminal
court, resulting in no fiscal impact because the Judicial Department has
the capacity and expertise to meet the bill's requirements.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB502 / File No. 592 7

SB502 File No. 592
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 502
AN ACT CONCERNING DISCRETIONARY TRANSFER FROM
JUVENILE COURT TO ADULT COURT.